Wisconsin, session 2025, SB982.
do enact as follows:SB982,11Section 1. 227.22 (2) (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:SB982,2,32227.22 (2) (intro.) A rule is effective on the first day of the 7th month 3commencing after the date of publication unless one of the following occurs:SB982,24Section 2. 227.24 (1) (c) of the statutes is amended to read:SB982,2,75227.24 (1) (c) A rule promulgated under par. (a) takes effect upon publication 6in the official state newspaper or on any later date specified in the rule and, except 7as provided under sub. (2), remains in effect only for 150 180 days.SB982,38Section 3. Initial applicability.SB982,2,119(1) This act first applies to a proposed rule or emergency rule whose 10statement of scope is presented for approval under s. 227.135 (2) on the effective 11date of this subsection.SB982,2,1212